Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.017

Home detention.

Under this chapter where a person charged with a felony offense is ordered to enter a program of home detention, "home detention" means any program meeting the definition of home detention in RCW 9.94A.030, and complying with the requirements of RCW 9.94A.736.

[ 2018 c 276 s 3; 2015 c 287 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 276: See note following RCW 10.21.015.